Oklahoma, session 2026, SB454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.545, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1210.545. A. Except as otherwise provided, as part of


the accountability system developed as provided for in Section


1210.541 of this title, the State Board of Education shall prepare


annual reports of the results of the Oklahoma School Testing Program


which describe student achievement in the state, and each school


site, pursuant to the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965

Req. No. 1090 Page 1


(ESEA) as reauthorized by P.L. No. 114-95, also known as the Every


Student Succeeds Act (ESSA), and any related federal regulations.


B. The annual report as required pursuant to subsection A of


this section shall identify school sites as having one of the


following grades for each indicator, separately, and by a single


overview grade of all indicators, defined according to rules of the


State Board of Education:


1. “A” means schools making excellent progress;


2. “B” means schools making above average progress;


3. “C” 2. “B” means schools making satisfactory progress; and


4. “D” 3. “C” means schools making less than satisfactory


progress; and


5. “F” means schools failing to make adequate progress in need


of support.


C. Each school that has students who are tested and included in


the school grading system as provided for in this section shall


receive a school grade, except as follows:


1. A school shall not receive a school grade if the number of


students tested and included in the school grading system is less


than the minimum sample size necessary for statistical reliability


and prevention of the unlawful release of personally identifiable


student data. The State Board of Education is directed to establish


the lowest minimum sample size necessary to meet the requirements of


this paragraph; and

Req. No. 1090 Page 2


2. The academic performance of students who are enrolled full-


time in an online program that is offered by a school district or


charter school that is not the district of residence or is not


located in the district of residence of the student shall be


reported separately by the school district or charter school and


shall not be included when determining the grade of the school site


or charter school.


D. The State Board of Education may adopt alternate systems of


accountability for statewide virtual charter schools, alternative


education programs as defined in Section 1210.568 of this title, and


schools serving only grades prekindergarten or kindergarten through


two.


E. The grade of a school shall be based on a multimeasures


approach to accountability in accordance with the Elementary and


Secondary Education Act of 1965 (ESEA) as reauthorized by P.L. No.


114-95, also known as the Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA) and any


federal regulations that include, but are not limited to, the


following indicators:


1. Statewide assessments, including the establishment of


student performance bands;


2. Graduation rates for high schools;


3. Statewide academic measures for elementary and middle


schools including measures to empower and equip parents or legal



Req. No. 1090 Page 3


guardians of students to successfully support learning outside of


school;


4. English language proficiency for English learners; and


5. At least one additional statewide measure of school quality


or student success, including, but not limited to, school climate,


school safety, student engagement, educator engagement, and/or


advanced coursework and postsecondary readiness, and school-based


social support services including strategies to bring community-


based counseling, family support services, health care, eye care,


dental care, food, and school-based counseling, based upon parent or


legal guardian surveys, town halls, parent or legal guardian


engagement and support trainings, parent or legal guardian mentoring


and support, training parents or legal guardians on technology, and


parents or legal guardians helping students with homework outside of


the classroom.


F. Of the indicators included in subsection E of this section,


not less than seventy percent (70%) of the overview grade must be


given to indicators 1, 2, 3, and 4 and, in the aggregate, with not


more than thirty percent (30%) of the grade given to indicator 5.


G. Further, the grade of an elementary or middle school site


shall include, but not be limited to, a measure of status for


English language arts (ELA), math, and science, growth in ELA and


math, English Language Proficiency Assessment (ELPA) progress, and


chronic absenteeism.

Req. No. 1090 Page 4


H. The grade of a high school site shall include, but not be


limited to, a measure of status for English language arts (ELA),


math, and science status, English Language Proficiency Assessment


(ELPA) progress, graduation rate, chronic absenteeism, and


postsecondary opportunities. For purposes of this section,


postsecondary opportunities shall include Advanced Placement


advanced placement, International Baccalaureate, dual and concurrent


enrollment, internships, mentorships and apprenticeships, and


industry certifications. The Board shall adopt a time line timeline


for moving from completion of such opportunities to crediting


achievement of such opportunities.


I. The annual report shall identify the performance of each


school as having improved, remained the same, or declined. This


school improvement rating shall be based on a comparison of the


student and school performance data of the current year to the


previous year data.


J. The State Department of Education shall annually develop a


school site report card to be delivered to parents throughout each


school district. The report card shall be in accordance with the


requirements of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965


(ESEA), as reauthorized and amended by P.L. No. 114-95, also known


as the Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA) and includes the grade for


the school, information regarding school improvement, an explanation


of school performance, and indicators of return on investment. The

Req. No. 1090 Page 5


report card for each school site shall be published annually by the


Department on its website, and every school district shall provide


the school site report card to the parent or guardian of each


student enrolled in the school site. In order to provide


information regarding school performance for school report cards


issued during the 2016-2017 and 2017-2018 school year, the


Department shall include an explanation of the changes to the


statewide system of student assessments as required in Section


1210.508 of this title and how the transition in assessments may


impact school performance. The Department shall issue school report


cards using the 2016-2017 school year assessment data that is


available.


K. The Legislature may factor in the performance of schools in


calculating any performance-based funding policy that is provided to


public school districts.


L. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1090 EB 1/19/2025 5:36:42 AM

Req. No. 1090 Page 6